resultats/hunspell/catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: afegir
SFX 15 Y 107
SFX 15 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 15 r nt/_C ir
SFX 15 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 15 r da/_Y ir
SFX 15 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 15 r des/_Y ir
SFX 15 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 15 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir ig/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 15 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir iges/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 15 r x/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir ig/_Z ir
SFX 15 r m/_Z ir
SFX 15 r u/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 15 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir igen/_Z ir
SFX 15 r a/_Z ir
SFX 15 r es/_Z ir
SFX 15 r a/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 15 r en/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 15 r res/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 15 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 15 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 15 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 15 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 15 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir ija/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir igi/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 15 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir iges/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir igis/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 15 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir ija/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir igi/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 15 r m/_Z ir
SFX 15 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 15 r u/_Z ir
SFX 15 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 15 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir igen/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 15 egir igin/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 15 r res/_Z ir
SFX 15 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 15 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 15 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 15 r x/_C ir
SFX 15 egir ig/_C ir
SFX 15 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 15 r sca/_D ir
SFX 15 egir ija/_D ir
SFX 15 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 15 egir igi/_D ir
SFX 15 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 15 r m/_C ir
SFX 15 r guem/_C ir
SFX 15 r u/_C ir
SFX 15 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 15 r squen/_C ir
SFX 15 egir igen/_C ir
SFX 15 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 15 egir igin/_C ir
SFX 15 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: aguar
SFX 16 Y 84
SFX 16 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 16 r nt/_C ar
SFX 16 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 16 r da/_Y ar
SFX 16 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 16 r des/_Y ar
SFX 16 uar úe/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úu/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úo/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar ües/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úa/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üem/_Z ar
SFX 16 r m/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üeu/_Z ar
SFX 16 r u/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üen/_Z ar
SFX 16 r va/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 16 r va/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üí/_Z ar
SFX 16 r res/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 16 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 16 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 16 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 16 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úe/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úes/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar ïs/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úe/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üem/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üeu/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úen/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar ïn/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üés/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üessis/_Z ar
SFX 16 r res/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üesses/_Z ar
SFX 16 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üés/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üéssim/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üéssem/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üéssiu/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üésseu/_Z ar
SFX 16 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üessin/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar üessen/_Z ar
SFX 16 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 16 uar úa/_D ar
SFX 16 uar úe/_D ar
SFX 16 ar ï/_D ar
SFX 16 uar üem/_C ar
SFX 16 r u/_C ar
SFX 16 uar üeu/_C ar
SFX 16 uar úen/_C ar
SFX 16 ar ïn/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: anar
SFX 17 Y 116
SFX 17 anar vaig/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vares/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vas/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar va/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vam/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vàrem/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vau/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vàreu/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar van/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar varen/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vaja/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagi/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vages/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagis/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vaja/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagi/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vàgem/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vàgim/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vàgeu/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vàgiu/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagen/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagin/_Z ar
SFX 17 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 17 r nt/_C ar
SFX 17 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 17 r da/_Y ar
SFX 17 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 17 r des/_Y ar
SFX 17 anar vaig/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vas/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar va/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 17 r m/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 17 r u/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar van/_Z ar
SFX 17 r va/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 17 r va/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 17 r res/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iré/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iré/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iràs/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iràs/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar irà/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar irà/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar irem/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar irem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar ireu/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar ireu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iran/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iran/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iria/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iria/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iries/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iries/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iria/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iria/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iríem/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iríem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar iríeu/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar iríeu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar irien/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar irien/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vaja/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagi/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vages/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagis/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vaja/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagi/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagen/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vagin/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 17 r res/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 17 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 17 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 17 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 17 anar vés/_C ar
SFX 17 anar vaja/_D ar
SFX 17 anar vagi/_D ar
SFX 17 ar em/_C ar
SFX 17 r u/_C ar
SFX 17 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 17 anar vagen/_C ar
SFX 17 anar vagin/_C ar
